New York, session 2025-2026, A578.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (f) of section 103 of the public officers law, 2 as amended by chapter 319 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (f) Open meetings of [an agency or authority] a public body shall be, 5 to the extent practicable and within available funds, broadcast to the 6 public and maintained as records of the [agency or authority] public 7 body. If the [agency or authority] public body maintains a website and 8 utilizes a high speed internet connection, such open meeting shall be, 9 to the extent practicable and within available funds, streamed on or 10 available through such website in real-time, and video recording of such 11 open meeting shall be posted on such website within five business days 12 of the meeting and for a reasonable time after the meeting and such 13 recordings shall be maintained for a period of not less than five years. 14 [For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "agency" shall mean only 15 a state department, board, bureau, division, council or office and any 16 public corporation the majority of whose members are appointed by the 17 governor. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "authority" shall 18 mean a public authority or public benefit corporation created by or 19 existing under any state law, at least one of whose members is appointed 20 by the governor (including any subsidiaries of such public authority or 21 public benefit corporation), other than an interstate or international 22 authority or public benefit corporation.] 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02376-01-5